Hawaii statutes.
§514E-5.5 Foreign time share plans;
exemption. (a) A foreign time share plan may obtain an exemption from the
requirements of this chapter as provided in this section.

(b) The developer of a foreign time share plan
shall pay an exemption fee of $100 and file the following minimum information
pertaining to the foreign time share plan with the director:

(1) The name and address of the foreign time share
plan;

(2) The name and address of the developer and seller
of the foreign time share plan, if any;

(3) The name and registration number of the time
share plan located in Hawaii; provided that the registration shall be active at
the time of filing under this subsection; and

(4) The duration of the foreign time share plan.

(c) Time share interests that are part of a
foreign time share plan exempt under this section shall not be resold in the United States.

(d) The developer of a foreign time share plan
exempt under this section shall not subject time share interests or units in
the foreign time share plan that are located in Hawaii to blanket liens.

(e) The contract to purchase an interest in a
foreign time share plan exempt under this section shall contain the following
disclosure in conspicuous type immediately above the space provided for the purchaser's
signature:

"THE
OFFERING AND OPERATION OF THIS TIME SHARE PLAN OUTSIDE THE JURISDICTIONAL
LIMITS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA IS EXEMPT FROM REGULATION UNDER HAWAII
LAW, AND ANY SUCH PURCHASE AND OPERATION OF THIS TIME SHARE PLAN IS NOT PROTECTED
BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF HAWAII. NO RESALE OF INTERESTS IN THIS TIME SHARE
PLAN MAY BE MADE BY ANY PERSON WITHIN THE JURISDICTIONAL LIMITS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA. THE MANAGEMENT AND OPERATION OF ANY ACCOMMODATIONS OR FACILITIES
LOCATED IN HAWAII, HOWEVER, ARE SUBJECT TO HAWAII LAW, AND MAY GIVE RISE TO AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION REGARDLESS OF WHERE THE OFFER WAS
MADE."

(f) All promotional literature and other
printed or written material used in connection with the sale of interests in a
foreign time share plan exempt under this section shall include the following
caption:

"This
time share plan is exempt from registration under Hawaii law and, therefore,
the purchase and operation of this time share plan is not protected by the laws
of the State of Hawaii."

(g) For the purposes of this section,
"foreign time share plan" means a time share use plan that:

(1) Contains time share interests or units located in
Hawaii that are part of a Hawaii time share plan; and

(2) Is offered and sold solely outside the
jurisdictional limits of the United States.

(h) Failure by the developer to abide by the
requirements for the exemption shall result in the loss of the exemption and
shall require registration under this chapter. [L 2006, c 278, §1; am L 2007, c
6, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next